Hawaii, session 2026, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature acknowledges the harmful effects of illegal gambling and drug activities in communities across the State. These effects include an increase in other criminal activities, such as crimes of violence and sex trafficking. The legislature believes that, rather than attempting to address these criminal activities in a piecemeal fashion, an intergovernmental task force comprising federal, state, and city agencies should be established to engage in an organized, collaborative effort to examine relevant issues, determine the resources needed to address these issues, and devise a coordinated action plan. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a special intergovernmental task force to eradicate illegal gambling and drug activities and to establish community safe zones across the State. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of the attorney general for administrative purposes a special intergovernmental task force to eradicate illegal gambling and drug activities. (b)  The task force shall consist of the following members: (1)  The attorney general or the attorney general's designee, who shall serve as the chair; (2)  The director of law enforcement or the director's designee; (3)  The director of transportation or the director's designee; (4)  The respective chiefs of police of the counties of Hawaii, Maui, Kauai, and of the City and County of Honolulu, or their designees; and (5)  The respective directors of the planning or permitting agencies of the counties of Hawaii, Maui, Kauai, and of the City and County of Honolulu, or their designees. (c)  Representatives from the following entities shall be invited to participate by the chair: (1)  The office of the United States Attorney, District of Hawaii; provided that, if participating, the representative shall be invited to serve as vice chair of the task force; provided further that the attorney general may designate another task force member to serve as vice chair if necessary; (2)  The United States Department of Homeland Security; (3)  The United States Drug Enforcement Agency; (4)  The Federal Bureau of Investigation; and (5)  Any governmental or private entity deemed relevant by the chair of the task force. (d)  The task force shall dedicate itself to the eradication of illegal gambling and drug activities in the State.  Accordingly, the task force shall engage in an organized, collaborative effort to examine relevant issues, determine the resources needed to address these issues, and devise a coordinated action plan.  In fulfilling its duties under this subsection, the task force shall consider the necessary resources and legislative actions that may be necessary to establish the following: (1)  A statewide program under the department of the attorney general to identify and eliminate illegal gambling houses and drug houses; and (2)  Community safe zones throughout the State for the purpose of enforcing zoning and other restrictions on lands that may be used for gambling activities, including casino gaming, regardless of whether the activities are legal or illegal; provided that the task force shall endeavor to establish, at a minimum, a requirement that lands that may be used for any type of gambling activity, and any structure thereupon, be situated more than ten thousand feet away from any church, school, or residential area; provided further that the task force shall also endeavor to establish an appropriate enforcement mechanism for this requirement. (e)  The chair and vice chair of the task force shall oversee the activities of the task force and lead the decision‑making of the task force members. (f)  The task force shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (g) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation and shall receive no reimbursement for expenses. (h) The members of the task force shall not be considered employees for the purposes of chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, based solely upon their participation in the task force. (i) The task force shall be dissolved upon adjournment sine die of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________